Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 8
POLLUTION PREVENTION ASSISTANCE DIVISION

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Pollution prevention action grant program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, The Pollution Prevention Assistance Division, Grant Program Division, Sec. 391-7-1-01.

12-8-180. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of natural resources.

"Division" means the Pollution Prevention Assistance Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Division director" means the director of the division.

"Environmental Protection Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-180

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1.)

12-8-181. Establishment of division; appointment of director; voluntary activities of businesses and industries.

There is established within the Department of Natural Resources the Pollution Prevention Assistance Division. The commissioner shall appoint a division director, subject to the approval of the board, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.

Any other provision of this article to the contrary notwithstanding, participation by private businesses and industries in the assistance activities of the division shall be voluntary.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-181

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1.)

12-8-182. Administrative responsibility of division; duty of division director; rules and regulations of board.

The division shall have responsibility for the administration of this article.

The division director shall assist the commissioner in instituting activities to fulfill the purposes of this article.

The board shall have the authority to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-182

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 12.)

12-8-183. Pollution prevention assistance plan.

Not later than October 1, 1994, the division shall complete a pollution prevention assistance plan to achieve voluntary participation by businesses and industries within the state in programs and activities designed to prevent the pollution of the environment by the products and by-products of such businesses and industries. The plan shall establish the objectives of the division and address such matters as the division deems appropriate.

The division shall publish the plan developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section for public comment and shall send a copy of the plan to the board, the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President of the Senate for comment. The division shall seek and encourage public comment on the plan and shall document and consider such comments.

The division shall present a final plan to the commissioner within 60 days after publication for public comment. If the commissioner approves, the division shall implement the plan. The plan may be amended from time to time as required or appropriate, after public notice and comment.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-183

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1.)

12-8-184. Confidentiality of information provided by business or industry; ownership of reports and plans.

The division shall not disclose to the public any information designated by law as confidential or proprietary provided by any business or industry in the course of developing and implementing pollution prevention and environmental waste reduction assessments and activities.
Pollution prevention and environmental waste reduction reports and plans developed by or for any business or industry shall be the property of such business or industry, except as otherwise agreed to and except for such reports as otherwise required by law to be the property of the division.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-184

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1.)

12-8-185. Duty of division to advise on rules and regulations governing toxic substances.

The division shall advise the director of the Environmental Protection Division on rules and regulations of the Environmental Protection Division governing toxic substance production, use, transport, distribution, and release into the workplace or the environment.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-185

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1.)

12-8-186. Biennial report of division.

On or before November 15, 1994, and biennially thereafter, the division shall prepare and present to the board, the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President of the Senate a report of the division's operations and activities pursuant to this article and an assessment of the future hazardous waste disposal capacity needs of the state. The report shall review progress toward pollution prevention and environmental waste reduction goals, provide an evaluation of progress by businesses and industries in this state, and make any appropriate recommendations for legislative action. The report shall include a proposed work plan for the following biennium which will provide, to the extent possible, an evaluation of projects and strategies for bringing about voluntary pollution prevention and waste reduction, alternatives to toxic use, objectives, financing, and institutional innovations.
The report may also include amendments to the plan required under Code Section 12-8-183.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-186

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1.)

12-8-187. Preparation by division of biennial report of hazardous waste generators and capacity assurance plan.

The division may, at the direction of the commissioner, prepare the biennial report of hazardous waste generators required under Section 104(k) of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 and prepare the capacity assurance plan required under 40 C.F.R. 262.41.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-187

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1.)

12-8-188. Biennial needs assessment report on hazardous waste management facility.

The division shall no less than biennially assess capacity, demand, generation, and other factors which may affect the determination of the need for a hazardous waste management facility in Georgia to be built with state support and involvement and shall include in the biennial report required by Code Section 12-8-186 a needs assessment report relative to the need for such a facility and the continued need for the assessment required by this Code section.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-188

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 12.)

12-8-189. Transfer of personnel and facilities of Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Authority and other state programs to division.

On October 1, 1993, the staff and physical and financial assets, property, records, and programs of the Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Authority shall be transferred to the division for administration and use by the division. Any funding subsequent to October 1, 1993, designated for or to such authority shall be directed to the division for administration and use by the division. Upon approval of the commissioner, the staff of the division may serve as staff to such authority for such periods of time as is determined by the commissioner to be necessary.

State programs of waste reduction, pollution prevention, and reporting implemented by other agencies, authorities, or divisions may be transferred, along with any financial and physical assets and records which are used in support of said programs, to the division for administration and use by the division.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-189

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 12.)

Editor's notes.

- The former provisions of Code Section 12-8-189, concerning the transfer of personnel and facilities of the Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Authority and other state programs to the division, were based on Ga. L. 1993, p. 1429,

§

1 and were repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 415,

§

12, effective April 18, 2002.